Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB611.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of November 10, 1999 (P.L.491, No.45), known as the Pennsylvania Construction Code Act, is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 8DECONSTRUCTION STANDARDSSection 801. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Certified deconstruction contractor." As follows:(1) A contractor that:12345678910111213141516171819 (i) has successfully completed a deconstruction certification program conducted by the department; and(ii) appears on a list of certified deconstruction contractors posted on the publicly accessible Internet website of the department.(2) A firm or other entity shall be considered a certified deconstruction contractor if at least one individual currently employed by the firm or other entity is certified."Deconstruction." The systematic dismantling of a structure, or portion of a structure, to maximize the salvage of materials for reuse, in preference over salvaging materials for recycling, energy recovery or sending the materials to a landfill."Heavy machinery." Equipment used in the deconstruction or demolition of a building or structure such as track hoes, excavators, skid steer loaders and forklifts."Primary dwelling structure." A residential building containing at least one but not more than four dwelling units based on current permitted occupancy at the time of the demolition permit application. The term does not include an accessory building such as a garage or shed."Recycling." The processing of waste materials into new products or material feed stock for products. Materials that can be recycled include, but are not limited to, concrete, metal piping and asphalt roofing shingles."Responsible party." Any of the following:(1) An owner or person in control of a primary dwelling structure.(2) An authorized agent of the owner or person described in paragraph (1).20250HB0611PN0624 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Reuse." The use of a product or material that was previously installed for the same or similar function to extend the life cycle of the product or material . Materials salvageable for reuse include, but are not limited to, cabinets, doors, windows, hardware, fixtures, flooring, siding and framing lumber.Section 802. Deconstruction assessment.Each primary dwelling structure in this Commonwealth that was erected prior to January 1, 1930, as indicated by municipal building records or, if no municipal building records exist, according to records of the county recorder of deeds in the county where the primary dwelling structure is located, and that meets the criteria established in this chapter shall undergo a deconstruction assessment prior to the demolition, renovation or other construction regarding the primary dwelling structure.Section 803. Deconstruction requirements.A primary dwelling structure shall be deconstructed in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and associated rules and regulations. The following apply:(1) Salvaged material may be sold, donated or reused on-site or off-site.(2) Each deconstruction project must achieve a documented 85% landfill diversion rate by weight and produce one salvaged item for every 500 square meters of design unless otherwise approved by the municipal code official in writing for the particular structure, based on economic or practical infeasibility as determined by the municipal code official after consideration and inspection.(3) Deconstruction under this chapter shall be performed only by a certified deconstruction professional certified and 20250HB0611PN0624 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 designated by the department under section 804.Section 804. Powers and duties of department.(a) Mandatory actions.--The department shall:(1) Administer the provisions of this chapter.(2) Adopt rules, procedures and forms to implement the provisions of this chapter.(3) Post the rules, procedures and forms to implement this chapter on the publicly accessible Internet website of the department.(4) With respect to deconstruction certification training:(i) Develop and conduct a deconstruction certification training program, which must include educational standards and requirements, to teach deconstruction methods and practice principles generally recognized in the deconstruction industry.(ii) Develop forms to be used by a contractor to apply for the deconstruction certification training program.(iii) After review of a contractor's qualifications and proof of successful completion of the deconstruction certification training program:(A) Designate the contractor as a certified deconstruction contractor.(B) Post the name of the contractor on the list of certified deconstruction contractors in this Commonwealth on the publicly accessible Internet website of the department.(5) Maintain and update the list, or a link to the list, of certified deconstruction contractors in this Commonwealth 20250HB0611PN0624 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 on the publicly accessible Internet website of the department.(b) Discretionary actions.--The department may permit labor unions, working in conjunction with the department, to develop and conduct deconstruction training programs that meet the standards established by the department in accordance with subsection (a)(4)(i). A contractor that successfully completes a department-approved labor union training program shall receive certification from the department, in which case subsection (a)(4)(iii)(A) shall apply.Section 805. Demolition permit application.An application for a demolition permit under this chapter for a primary dwelling structure shall not be considered complete unless the application is accompanied by a completed predeconstruction form provided by the municipal code official, including a list of targeted salvageable materials and final destinations, or by a municipal code official-approved exemption issued under section 810.Section 806. Assessments to determine deconstruction or demolition.A municipal code official for the municipality in which the subject primary dwelling structure is located shall perform an assessment of the primary dwelling structure and determine if the primary dwelling structure shall undergo deconstruction rather than demolition. The assessment:(1) Shall apply to all demolition, renovation or other construction projects.(2) May include input from the municipal government in which the primary dwelling structure is located and any relevant historical commission or organization in the 20250HB0611PN0624 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 municipality or county in which the primary dwelling structure is located.Section 807. Participation of certified deconstruction contractors.Regarding the need for a certified deconstruction contractor during deconstruction:(1) Deconstruction may only be performed by a certified deconstruction contractor.(2) At least one certified employee of the contractor shall be present on the job site when activities related to deconstruction are underway.Section 808. Heavy machinery.(a) Permissible use.--Heavy machinery may be used in deconstruction to assist in the salvage of materials for reuse or to remove material not required to be salvaged for reuse.(b) Prohibited use.--Heavy machinery may not be used in deconstruction to remove or dismantle components of buildings in ways that render building components unsuitable for salvage.Section 809. Documentation.(a) Receipts.--A deconstruction permit holder shall maintain receipts for donation, sale, recycling and disposal of all materials for a deconstruction project.(b) Photographs.--Materials that are intended for reuse on-site, or that are disposed of during a deconstruction project and for which no receipt for disposal is obtainable, shall be documented with photographs.(c) Inspection.--A municipal code official for a municipality may at any time request that a deconstruction permit holder working in the municipality produce the receipts or photographs specified in this section.20250HB0611PN0624 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 810. Exemptions.(a) Exempted circumstances.--The following are exempt from the requirements of this chapter:(1) The moving of a building.(2) A primary building structure that the municipal code official has determined unsuitable for deconstruction if either of the following are true:(i) The structure is structurally unsafe or is otherwise hazardous to the health, safety or welfare of the public and too unsafe or hazardous for deconstruction.(ii) Most or a substantial portion of the material in the structure is not suitable for reuse.(b) Request for exemption.--A municipal code official shall make the final determination of exemption based on evidence submitted by the applicant and an inspection to confirm conditions and unsuitability. A demolition permit may not be issued until the final determination is made on the exemption request.Section 811. Enforcement and penalties.(a) Amount of civil penalties.--A person that violates this chapter shall be subject to the following penalties, which shall be enforced by and payable to the municipality in which the violation occurred:(1) For a first violation, a civil penalty of up to $1,000.(2) For a second violation, a civil penalty of up to $2,000.(3) For a third or subsequent violation, a civil penalty of up to $3,000.20250HB0611PN0624 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Frequency of civil penalties.--Civil penalties under subsection (a) may be imposed on a per month, per day or per incident basis as determined by the municipality.(c) Heavy machinery penalties.--Improper use of heavy machinery in violation of this chapter shall be subject to a penalty of up to $20,000 and shall be enforced and payable to the municipality in which the violation occurred.(d) Additional enforcement actions for certified deconstruction contractors.--The department may impose the following additional penalties on a certified deconstruction contractor:(1) For a first violation of this chapter, the removal from the list of certified deconstruction contractors for up to six months.(2) For a second violation of this chapter, the removal from the list of certified deconstruction contractors for up to 12 months.(3) For a third or subsequent violation of this chapter, the removal from the list of certified deconstruction contractors for an indefinite period. The contractor may not apply for reinstatement to the list of certified deconstruction contractors for a period of at least 18 months.(4) If a deconstruction contractor falsely advertises or otherwise falsely portrays the deconstruction contractor as a certified deconstruction contractor, a fine of up to $10,000 per occurrence.Section 812. Stop work orders.When necessary to obtain compliance with this chapter, a municipal code official may issue a stop work order requiring 20250HB0611PN0624 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 that all work, except work directly related to the elimination of the violation, be immediately and completely stopped. The following apply:(1) If the municipal code official issues a stop work order, activity subject to the order may not be resumed until the municipal code official gives specific approval in writing.(2) As follows:(i) Subject to subparagraph (ii), the stop work order shall be in writing and posted at a conspicuous location at the worksite.(ii) When an emergency condition exists, the stop work order may be issued orally, followed by a written stop work order as soon as practicable.(3) A person may not remove, obscure, mutilate or otherwise damage a stop work order.Section 813. Inspections.(a) Authorization.--A municipal code official may conduct inspections whenever:(1) necessary to determine compliance with this chapter or enforce any provision of this chapter; or(2) the municipal code official has reasonable cause to believe that there exists a violation of this chapter.(b) Credentials.--If a responsible party is at the worksite when an inspection is occurring, the municipal code official conducting the inspection shall present proper credentials to the responsible party and request entry.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0611PN0624 - 9 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728